Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-124
Annexation; succession to property, contracts, obligations, and choses in action.

Whenever any city of the first class extends its boundaries so as to annex any village or city of the second class, the charter, laws, ordinances, powers, and government of such city of the first class shall at once extend over the territory within any village or city of the second class so annexed. Such city of the first class shall succeed to all the property and property rights of every kind, contracts, obligations, and choses in action of every kind held by or belonging to the village or city of the second class so annexed, and it shall be liable for and assume and carry out all valid contracts, obligations, franchises, and licenses of any such village or city of the second class so annexed. Any obligations incurred by such village or city of the second class for water, paving, sewer, or sewer treatment purposes shall remain the obligation of the real property in such village or city of the second class as its boundaries existed immediately prior to such annexation. Such village or city of the second class so annexed shall be deemed fully compensated by virtue of such annexation and the assumption of its obligations and contracts for all its property and property rights of every kind so acquired.

Laws 1969, c. 72, § 3, p. 395;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 11.